Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-317.01
Commercial fertilizer trailer, defined.

Commercial fertilizer trailer means a fertilizer trailer owned by any individual or business entity that, for profit on a commercial basis, sells agricultural fertilizer or agricultural chemicals.

Laws 2025, LB398, § 13.